Arkansas, session 2025, SB350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - DRUG TASK FORCE COORDINATOR. There is
hereby established for the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) DRUG TASK FORCE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS12
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1
*JAR051*
02/27/2025 2:43:51 PM JAR051

SB350

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DRUG TASK FORCE COORDINATOR. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator, to be
payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator - Drug Task
Force Coordinator for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $180,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 72,000
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 75,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 2,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $329,000

SECTION 3. REGULAR SALARIES - MULTI-JURISDICTIONAL DRUG TASK FORCE.
There is hereby established for the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) DRUG TASK FORCE COMMANDER 20 GRADE GS11
(2) DRUG TASK FORCE SUPERVISING AGENT 20 GRADE GS09
(3) DRUG TASK FORCE AGENT 60 GRADE GS09
(4) DRUG TASK FORCE ADMIN. ASST. 20 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 120

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - MULTI-JURISDICTIONAL DRUG TASK FORCE. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator, to be
payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and
02/27/2025 2:43:51 PM JAR051

SB350
operating expenses of the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator - Multi-
Jurisdictional Drug Task Force for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $8,032,400
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,212,960
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,821,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $14,066,360

SECTION 5. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SALARIES.
The salaries of the Multi-Jurisdictional Drug Task Force agents and employees
shall be consistent with that established by the state pay plan for the
appropriate grade of each position.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2025 to June 30, 2026.

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. LEAVE
BENEFITS. Drug Task Force agents and employees who convert from county or
grant funded employment to state employment and are employed prior to the
effective date of this legislation shall have their length of service with
the county recognized for purposes of accrual rates for sick leave and annual
leave.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2025 to June 30, 2026.

SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUNDING OF
02/27/2025 2:43:51 PM JAR051

SB350
EXPENSES AND ADDITIONAL EMPLOYEES OF THE MULTI-JURISDICTIONAL DRUG TASK
FORCE. Each Multi-Jurisdictional Drug Task Force shall continue to bear the
responsibility and expense of providing, at the Multi-Jurisdictional Drug
Task Force expense the following at sufficient levels for operation:
(1) The cost of facilities, equipment supplies, and other office expenses
for the Multi-Jurisdictional Task Force.
(2) The Drug Task Force shall provide compensation of additional personnel
and expenses within the Drug Task Force which are not covered by this Act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2025 to June 30, 2026.

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUNDS.
The funds designated by this Act shall not be subject to the provisions of
Ark. Code Ann. §12-17-102 (b)(2).
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2025 to June 30, 2026.

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General Assembly, in the
transition to a state-funded Multi-Jurisdictional Drug Task Force system, to
provide an appropriate and adequate level of Drug Enforcement Activity
through Multi-Jurisdictional Task Forces in all areas of the state. It is
recognized by the General Assembly that in many areas of the state resources
have not been available to support Drug Enforcement at the necessary level.
With the transition of funding of Multi-Jurisdictional Drug Task Forces to
state funding; it is not the intent of the General Assembly to adversely
affect those districts whose system has been working well or to implement a
system which is too inflexible to respond to the needs of each judicial
district or task force area. Therefore, the Prosecution Coordination
Commission is charged with the responsibility of assisting in the maintenance
of a system which equitably serves all areas of the state by providing
statewide coordination of drug enforcement with law enforcement agencies
statewide.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
02/27/2025 2:43:51 PM JAR051

SB350
2025 to June 30, 2026.

SECTION 10. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 11. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 12. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.




02/27/2025 2:43:51 PM JAR051